Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.300

Apprenticeship training programs—Purpose.

A well-trained construction trades workforce is critical to the ability of the state of Washington to construct public works. Studies of the state's workforce highlight population trends that, without a concerted effort to offset them, will lead to an inadequate supply of skilled workers in the construction industry. State government regularly constructs public works. The efficient and economical construction of public works projects will be harmed if there is not an ample supply of trained construction workers. Apprenticeship training programs are particularly effective in providing training and experience to individuals seeking to enter or advance in the workforce. By providing for apprenticeship utilization on public works projects, state government can create opportunities for training and experience that will help assure that a trained workforce will be available, including returning veterans, in sufficient numbers in the future for the construction of public works. Furthermore, the state of Washington hereby establishes its intent to assist returning veterans through programs such as the "helmets to hardhats" program, which is administered by the center for military recruitment, assessment, and veterans employment. It is the state's intent to assist returning veterans with apprenticeship placement career opportunities, in order to expedite the transition from military service to the construction workforce.

[ 2006 c 321 s 1; 2005 c 3 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 3: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [February 24, 2005]." [ 2005 c 3 s 5.]